Utah statutes.
4-15-6.   Nursery stock for wholesale or retail sale -- Graded and sized -- Labels and tags -- Information to appear on label or tag.

(1)  Each type of nursery stock delivered to a nursery or nursery outlet for subsequent wholesale or retail sale shall:

(a)  be sized and graded in accordance with the applicable rules of the department; and 

(b)  bear a tag or label with the name, grade, size, and variety of the stock.

(2)  Each bundle, single lot, or single nursery stock sold at retail shall bear a secure tag or label with the common or botanical name, grade, size, and variety of the stock legibly printed or written on it.



Amended by Chapter 179, 2007 General Session

